Washington statutes.
RCW 2.56.210

Court access and accommodations coordinator—Duties.

(1) Washington state courts are required by chapter 49.60 RCW, the law against discrimination, and by 42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq., the Americans with disabilities act, to provide equal access to persons with disabilities. To assist the courts to comply with these laws, the administrative office of the courts shall, subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this purpose, create the position of court access and accommodations coordinator.

(2) The coordinator shall:

(a) Review the needs of courts statewide for training and other assistance required to provide access and accommodation for persons with disabilities;

(b) Provide guidance and assistance upon request;

(c) Identify appropriate assistive devices and establish a system to improve courts' access to such devices.

(3) In carrying out the duties under this section, the coordinator shall consult with persons with disabilities, and shall facilitate communication between the administrative office of the courts and such persons and their representative groups.

[ 2008 c 148 s 1.]